Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-118
Signature, defined; person unable to write; assistance.

(1) Signature shall mean the name or symbol of a person written with his or her own hand.

(2) A person with a disability who by reason of that disability is unable to write his or her name or symbol may substitute either:

(a) A mark if the person's name is written by some other person and the mark is made near the name by the person unable to write his or her name or symbol; or

(b) An impression made using a signature stamp. A signature stamp shall be used only by that person or another person upon the request and in the presence of the person unable to write his or her name or symbol.

(3) Any person rendering assistance to a person unable to write his or her name or symbol shall write, next to such person's mark or impression, the name and address of the person rendering assistance.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 18;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 6.